Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5142
Insurance company stock.

(1) Stock insurers which maintain capital stock required by section 44-214 and nonstock insurers which maintain surplus required by section 44-219 may invest in the common and preferred stock of other insurers.

(2) An insurer's investments authorized under this section shall not exceed the lesser of (a) the amount by which such insurer's admitted assets exceed its required capital and liabilities if a stock insurer or its required surplus and liabilities if a nonstock insurer or (b) fifty percent of its policyholders surplus.

(3) In calculating the admitted assets of the insurer acquiring the stock of another insurer pursuant to this section, the value of any investment in such common or preferred stock shall be the cost of such stock to the acquiring insurer.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 42.